Texas statutes.
CIVIL PRACTICE AND REMEDIES CODE

TITLE 2. TRIAL, JUDGMENT, AND APPEAL

SUBTITLE C. JUDGMENTS

CHAPTER 39. DEFAULT JUDGMENTS IN CERTAIN CASES DEFENDED BY ATTORNEY GENERAL

Sec. 39.001. NOTICE OF INTENT TO TAKE DEFAULT JUDGMENT. Notice of intent to take a default judgment against the state, a state agency, or a party in a civil case for which Chapter 104 authorizes representation by the attorney general shall be mailed to the attorney general at the attorney general's office in Austin, Texas, by United States Postal Service certified mail, return receipt requested, not later than the 10th day before the entry of the default judgment.

Added by Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 167, Sec. 3.09(a), eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

Sec. 39.002. FAILURE TO GIVE NOTICE. Failure to give notice in a case in which notice is required by Section 30.004(b) or Section 39.001 results in any default judgment in the case being set aside without costs.

Added by Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 167, Sec. 3.09(a), eff. Sept. 1, 1987.